Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.708

[Art. 97] Unlawful detention of another.

Any person subject to this code who, except as provided by law or regulation, apprehends, arrests, or confines any person shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 1963 c 220 s 96.]